Maryland, session 2026, HB1407.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) If there is an occurrence of federal judicial action regarding the timely receipt
of absentee ballots with federal contests that preempts regulations adopted by the State
Board of Elections in COMAR 33.11.03.08, in accordance with § 11–302 of the Election Law
Article, that prescribe timely receipt of absentee ballots in the State, the State
Administrator of Elections shall provide additional notice to voters in the State of the
requirements:
(1) under federal law for timely receipt of absentee ballots with federal
contests; and
(2) under State law for the timely receipt of absentee ballots with State and
local contests.
(b) The notice required under subsection (a) of this section shall, at minimum,
encourage an early return of absentee ballots by urging voters to:
(1) mail the ballot at least 1 week before election day; or
(2) place the ballot in an official ballot drop box on or before election day.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1407*

HOUSE BILL 1407
(c) The State Administrator shall use multiple methods to provide the notice
required under this section, including written notice with instructions for sample ballots
and ballots, a social media campaign, and mass media communications.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 6 months and, at the end of November 30,
2026, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated
and of no further force and effect.